Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1314

Relationship to other laws.

(1) This subchapter does not authorize an act prohibited by, and does not affect the application or requirements of, law other than this subchapter.

(2) A conversion effected under this subchapter may not create or impair a right, duty, or obligation of a person under the statutory law of this state relating to a change in control, takeover, business combination, control-share acquisition, or similar transaction involving a domestic merging, acquired, or converting cooperative association unless the approval of the plan is by a vote of the members or directors which would be sufficient to create or impair the right, duty, or obligation directly under the law.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1314.]